Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201748-682
Short-time compensation; when considered exhaustee.

An individual who has received all of the short-time compensation or combined unemployment compensation and short-time compensation available in a benefit year shall be considered an exhaustee for purposes of extended benefits under section 48-628.14 and, if otherwise eligible under such section, shall be eligible to receive extended benefits.

Laws 2014, LB961, § 23;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 83.
January 1, 2018